Utah statutes.
4-31-17.   Quarantine -- Peace officers to assist in maintenance of
quarantine.
The commissioner may quarantine any infected domestic animal or area within
the state to prevent the spread of infectious or contagious disease. Sheriffs
and other peace officers within the state shall, upon request of the
commissioner, assist the department in maintaining a quarantine and shall
arrest anyone who violates it. The department shall pay all costs and fees
incurred by any law enforcement authority in assisting the department.
